Tennessee statutes. Title 22 Juries And Jurors
Chapter 4

Compensation of Jurors

22-4-101. Per diem and travel allowance.

Every regular juror, including jurors on chancery court juries, is entitled to receive at least ten dollars ($10.00) for each day's attendance.

The legislative body of any county or the legislative body of the metropolitan government of any county having a metropolitan form of government may by vote increase this rate to an amount in excess of ten dollars ($10.00) for each day's attendance and to allow all tolls necessarily incurred in going to and returning from court and mileage at the rate of ten cents (10¢) per mile on the way from the home of the juror to the courthouse of the county where the juror is summoned and attends. In the alternative, the county may pay each juror a flat rate of eleven dollars ($11.00) per day, or any county with a metropolitan or home rule type of government may, at its option, set the compensation for each juror in its county by ordinance, to be paid out of the county treasury.

This section shall not be intended or considered as repealing or rescinding any special or private act now in effect.

The amount of fees or compensation of juries serving in all criminal actions shall be equal to that of juries serving in felony cases.

Notwithstanding this section, any juror who is sequestered is entitled to receive at least thirty dollars ($30.00) for each day's attendance.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 22-4-101 — 22-4-109 (Code 1858, §§ 4031 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4032, 4033 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4035 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1), 4036 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 18), 4037 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8; 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 3); Acts 1866-1867, ch. 3, § 1; 1867-1868, ch. 67, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 120, § 1; 1875, ch. 42, § 1; 1875, ch. 91, §§ 1, 3; 1899, ch. 7; 1909, ch. 337, §§ 1, 3; 1915, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., §§ 5843-5845, 5847, 5848, 5848a1, 5849; Code 1932, §§ 10042, 10043, 10045-10049; Acts 1949, ch. 129, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10042; Acts 1951, ch. 184, § 1; 1959, ch. 163, § 1; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; 1973, ch. 138, § 1; modified; Acts 1978, ch. 522, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-401 — 22-408; Acts 1982, ch. 784, § 1; 1985, ch. 43, § 1; 1986, ch. 583, § 1; 1986, ch. 702, § 1; 1986, ch. 760, § 1; 1988, ch. 596, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 101, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1992, ch. 894, § 1; 1998, ch. 959, § 1; 1999, ch. 39, § 1; 2004, ch. 523, § 1; 2006, ch. 519, § 1), concerning compensation of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

Cross-References. Liability of state or county, § 40-25-129.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 25.24.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, § 2.

Law Reviews.

Jury Reform in Tennessee, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 1 (2003).

The Tennessee Court System (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 189.

Comparative Legislation. Compensation of jurors:

Ala. Code § 12-16-8.

Ark. Code § 16-34-103.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §§ 15-12-7 — 15-12-9.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 29A.330.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 494.455.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 7A-312.

Va. Code § 14.1-195.1 et seq.

Collateral References. 47 Am. Jur. 2d Jury §§ 84, 86, 87.

50 C.J.S. Juries § 207.

Jury
77.

22-4-102. Tales jurors.

Tales jurors shall be compensated in the same manner as regular jurors.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 22-4-101 — 22-4-109 (Code 1858, §§ 4031 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4032, 4033 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4035 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1), 4036 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 18), 4037 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8; 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 3); Acts 1866-1867, ch. 3, § 1; 1867-1868, ch. 67, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 120, § 1; 1875, ch. 42, § 1; 1875, ch. 91, §§ 1, 3; 1899, ch. 7; 1909, ch. 337, §§ 1, 3; 1915, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., §§ 5843-5845, 5847, 5848, 5848a1, 5849; Code 1932, §§ 10042, 10043, 10045-10049; Acts 1949, ch. 129, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10042; Acts 1951, ch. 184, § 1; 1959, ch. 163, § 1; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; 1973, ch. 138, § 1; modified; Acts 1978, ch. 522, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-401 — 22-408; Acts 1982, ch. 784, § 1; 1985, ch. 43, § 1; 1986, ch. 583, § 1; 1986, ch. 702, § 1; 1986, ch. 760, § 1; 1988, ch. 596, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 101, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1992, ch. 894, § 1; 1998, ch. 959, § 1; 1999, ch. 39, § 1; 2004, ch. 523, § 1; 2006, ch. 519, § 1), concerning compensation of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

22-4-103. Reimbursement of jurors.

To qualify for reimbursement, jurors must prove, under oath, during the jury service term in which they serve and before the jury coordinator, the tolls necessarily incurred in going to or returning from their place of residence to the courthouse.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 22-4-101 — 22-4-109 (Code 1858, §§ 4031 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4032, 4033 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4035 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1), 4036 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 18), 4037 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8; 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 3); Acts 1866-1867, ch. 3, § 1; 1867-1868, ch. 67, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 120, § 1; 1875, ch. 42, § 1; 1875, ch. 91, §§ 1, 3; 1899, ch. 7; 1909, ch. 337, §§ 1, 3; 1915, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., §§ 5843-5845, 5847, 5848, 5848a1, 5849; Code 1932, §§ 10042, 10043, 10045-10049; Acts 1949, ch. 129, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10042; Acts 1951, ch. 184, § 1; 1959, ch. 163, § 1; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; 1973, ch. 138, § 1; modified; Acts 1978, ch. 522, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-401 — 22-408; Acts 1982, ch. 784, § 1; 1985, ch. 43, § 1; 1986, ch. 583, § 1; 1986, ch. 702, § 1; 1986, ch. 760, § 1; 1988, ch. 596, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 101, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1992, ch. 894, § 1; 1998, ch. 959, § 1; 1999, ch. 39, § 1; 2004, ch. 523, § 1; 2006, ch. 519, § 1), concerning compensation of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

22-4-104. Certification of list to county official.

The jury coordinator shall, when the jury pool is discharged, make out and certify a list of the jurors, with the number of days they have respectively served, and the amount due to each, and deliver the list to the appropriate county official, who shall compensate jurors in the amount due to each of them in accordance with applicable financial procedures in the county.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 22-4-101 — 22-4-109 (Code 1858, §§ 4031 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4032, 4033 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4035 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1), 4036 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 18), 4037 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8; 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 3); Acts 1866-1867, ch. 3, § 1; 1867-1868, ch. 67, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 120, § 1; 1875, ch. 42, § 1; 1875, ch. 91, §§ 1, 3; 1899, ch. 7; 1909, ch. 337, §§ 1, 3; 1915, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., §§ 5843-5845, 5847, 5848, 5848a1, 5849; Code 1932, §§ 10042, 10043, 10045-10049; Acts 1949, ch. 129, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10042; Acts 1951, ch. 184, § 1; 1959, ch. 163, § 1; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; 1973, ch. 138, § 1; modified; Acts 1978, ch. 522, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-401 — 22-408; Acts 1982, ch. 784, § 1; 1985, ch. 43, § 1; 1986, ch. 583, § 1; 1986, ch. 702, § 1; 1986, ch. 760, § 1; 1988, ch. 596, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 101, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1992, ch. 894, § 1; 1998, ch. 959, § 1; 1999, ch. 39, § 1; 2004, ch. 523, § 1; 2006, ch. 519, § 1), concerning compensation of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

Cross-References. Evidence of jurors' claims, § 5-9-305.

Collateral References. Clerks of courts
22, 51.

22-4-105. Issuance of warrants.

It is the duty of the county to issue a warrant in payment of jury service every thirty (30) days, for the full amount due up to that time, to each member of a regular, grand or petit jury, when the jury service term extends beyond thirty (30) days in length.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 22-4-101 — 22-4-109 (Code 1858, §§ 4031 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4032, 4033 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4035 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1), 4036 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 18), 4037 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8; 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 3); Acts 1866-1867, ch. 3, § 1; 1867-1868, ch. 67, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 120, § 1; 1875, ch. 42, § 1; 1875, ch. 91, §§ 1, 3; 1899, ch. 7; 1909, ch. 337, §§ 1, 3; 1915, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., §§ 5843-5845, 5847, 5848, 5848a1, 5849; Code 1932, §§ 10042, 10043, 10045-10049; Acts 1949, ch. 129, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10042; Acts 1951, ch. 184, § 1; 1959, ch. 163, § 1; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; 1973, ch. 138, § 1; modified; Acts 1978, ch. 522, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-401 — 22-408; Acts 1982, ch. 784, § 1; 1985, ch. 43, § 1; 1986, ch. 583, § 1; 1986, ch. 702, § 1; 1986, ch. 760, § 1; 1988, ch. 596, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 101, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1992, ch. 894, § 1; 1998, ch. 959, § 1; 1999, ch. 39, § 1; 2004, ch. 523, § 1; 2006, ch. 519, § 1), concerning compensation of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

22-4-106. Absence from employment — Amount of compensation.

Upon receiving a summons to report for jury duty, any employee shall, on the next day the employee is engaged in the employee's employment, exhibit the summons to the employee's immediate superior, and the employer shall thereupon excuse the employee from employment for each day the employee's service as a juror in any court of the United States or this state exceeds three (3) hours.

If an employee summoned for jury duty is working a night shift or is working during hours preceding those in which court is normally held, the employee shall also be excused from employment as provided by this section for the shift immediately preceding the employee's first day of service. After the first day of service, when the person's responsibility for jury duty exceeds three (3) hours during a day, the person whose circumstances fall within the parameters of this subdivision (a)(2) shall be excused from the person's next scheduled work period occurring within twenty-four (24) hours of that day of jury service. Any question concerning the application of this subdivision (a)(2) to a particular work shift or shifts shall be conclusively resolved by the trial judge of the court to which the employee has been summoned.

Notwithstanding the excused absence as provided in subsection (a), the employee shall be entitled to the employee's usual compensation received from such employment; however, the employer has the discretion to deduct the amount of the fee or compensation the employee receives for serving as a juror. Moreover, no employer shall be required to compensate an employee for more time than was actually spent serving and traveling to and from jury duty. If an employer employs less than five (5) people on a regular basis or if the juror has been employed by an employer on a temporary basis for less than six (6) months, the employer is not required to compensate the juror during the period of jury service pursuant to this section.

It is the duty of all persons paying jurors their fee or compensation for jury service to issue to each juror a statement showing the daily fee or compensation and the total amount of fees or compensation received by the juror. The person also shall provide a juror with a statement showing the number of hours the juror spent serving each day if the juror or juror's employer requests such a statement prior to the service at issue.

No employer shall discharge or in any manner discriminate against an employee for serving on jury duty if the employee, prior to taking time off, gives the required notice pursuant to subsection (a).

Any employee who is discharged, demoted or suspended because the employee has taken time off to serve on jury duty is entitled to reinstatement and reimbursement for lost wages and work benefits caused by such acts of the employer.

Any employer who willfully refuses to rehire or otherwise restore an employee or former employee commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Any employer who violates this section commits a Class A misdemeanor.

For the purposes of this section, “employer” includes, but is not limited to, the state of Tennessee or any local government.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 22-4-101 — 22-4-109 (Code 1858, §§ 4031 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4032, 4033 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4035 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1), 4036 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 18), 4037 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8; 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 3); Acts 1866-1867, ch. 3, § 1; 1867-1868, ch. 67, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 120, § 1; 1875, ch. 42, § 1; 1875, ch. 91, §§ 1, 3; 1899, ch. 7; 1909, ch. 337, §§ 1, 3; 1915, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., §§ 5843-5845, 5847, 5848, 5848a1, 5849; Code 1932, §§ 10042, 10043, 10045-10049; Acts 1949, ch. 129, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10042; Acts 1951, ch. 184, § 1; 1959, ch. 163, § 1; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; 1973, ch. 138, § 1; modified; Acts 1978, ch. 522, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-401 — 22-408; Acts 1982, ch. 784, § 1; 1985, ch. 43, § 1; 1986, ch. 583, § 1; 1986, ch. 702, § 1; 1986, ch. 760, § 1; 1988, ch. 596, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 101, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1992, ch. 894, § 1; 1998, ch. 959, § 1; 1999, ch. 39, § 1; 2004, ch. 523, § 1; 2006, ch. 519, § 1), concerning compensation of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Textbooks. Pritchard on Wills and Administration of Estates (4th ed., Phillips and Robinson), § 845.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 25.24.

Law Reviews.

Torts — Hodges v. S.C. Toof & Co.: New Substantive and Procedural Changes in the Awarding of Punitive Damages in Tennessee, 23 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 239 (1992).

Tennessee Attempts to Tighten the Purse Strings on Punitive Damages: Hodges v. S.C. Toof & Co. (P. Steven Hacker), 60 Tenn. L. Rev. 983 (1993).

Workers' Compensation — Anderson v. Standard Register Co.: Tennessee Supreme Court Specifies Elements Required to Establish a Cause of Action for Retaliatory Discharge in Workers' Compensation Cases, 24 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 825 (1994).

Revisiting the Tennessee Employment-At-Will Doctrine — What Is the Exception and What Is the Rule? (Frederick J. Lewis, Jeffery A. Jarratt), 19 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 171 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. Contractor not required to pay temporary craftsmen during jury service, OAG 00-104 (1/27/99).

Jury duty travel compensation. OAG 11-72, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 74 (10/10/11).

Cited: Admiral Webster v. Psychemedics Corporation, — S.W.3d —, 2011 Tenn. App. LEXIS 335 (Tenn. Ct. App. June 24, 2011).

22-4-107. Donation of juror reimbursement to criminal injuries compensation fund.

Each prospective juror reporting for jury service shall be provided a form letter that, when signed by the prospective juror, directs the county treasurer to donate all of the prospective juror's reimbursement for jury service to the criminal injuries compensation fund provided for in title 29, chapter 13.

The county treasurer shall send all donations made under subsection (a) to the state department of the treasury for deposit to the credit of the criminal injuries compensation fund.

Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 4, §§ 22-4-101 — 22-4-109 (Code 1858, §§ 4031 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1; 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4032, 4033 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8), 4035 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 4, § 1), 4036 (deriv. Acts 1827, ch. 49, § 18), 4037 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 6, § 8; 1835-1836, ch. 18, § 3); Acts 1866-1867, ch. 3, § 1; 1867-1868, ch. 67, § 1; 1870-1871, ch. 120, § 1; 1875, ch. 42, § 1; 1875, ch. 91, §§ 1, 3; 1899, ch. 7; 1909, ch. 337, §§ 1, 3; 1915, ch. 70, § 1; Shan., §§ 5843-5845, 5847, 5848, 5848a1, 5849; Code 1932, §§ 10042, 10043, 10045-10049; Acts 1949, ch. 129, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 10042; Acts 1951, ch. 184, § 1; 1959, ch. 163, § 1; 1965, ch. 61, § 1; 1973, ch. 138, § 1; modified; Acts 1978, ch. 522, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 22-401 — 22-408; Acts 1982, ch. 784, § 1; 1985, ch. 43, § 1; 1986, ch. 583, § 1; 1986, ch. 702, § 1; 1986, ch. 760, § 1; 1988, ch. 596, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 101, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6; 1992, ch. 894, § 1; 1998, ch. 959, § 1; 1999, ch. 39, § 1; 2004, ch. 523, § 1; 2006, ch. 519, § 1), concerning compensation of jurors, was repealed by Acts 2008, ch. 1159, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.